Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-239.05
Violations; penalty.

Any person, firm or corporation, the members of any firm, or the officers of any corporation, violating the provisions of sections 76-239.01 to 76-239.06 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Laws 1969, c. 612, § 5, p. 2492.